New York, session 2025-2026, A10952.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 622.0, 622.4 and 622.5 of the Nassau county civil 2 divisions act, as added by chapter 65 of the laws of 1940, are amended 3 to read as follows: 4 § 622.0 Incorporation; membership. a. A corporation by the name of 5 "Volunteer and Exempt [Firemen's] Firefighter's Benevolent Association 6 of Albertson," is hereby created. 7 b. It shall be composed of all persons who now are, or hereafter shall 8 be volunteer members of the Albertson Hook, Ladder, Engine and Hose 9 Company No. 1, and such exempt volunteer [firemen] firefighters, as 10 defined in section two hundred of the general municipal law, who have 11 acquired such status by virtue of having rendered service in the Albert- 12 son Hook, Ladder, Engine and Hose Company No. 1 of Albertson, town of 13 North Hempstead, as shall: 14 1. Notify the secretary of the Albertson Hook, Ladder, Engine and Hose 15 Company No. 1, Albertson, Nassau county, New York, in writing, prior to 16 the organization meeting of the corporation created by this article, 17 which meeting is hereinafter provided for, of their desire to become 18 members, or 19 2. Attend such organization meeting or an adjournment thereof, or 20 3. Notify the secretary of such corporation in writing, within sixty 21 days after [his] such secretary election, of their desire to become 22 members thereof, and also such other of the exempt volunteer [firemen] 23 firefighters aforesaid, or of those who may hereafter become exempt 24 volunteer [firemen] firefighters of the Albertson Hook, Ladder, Engine 25 and Hose Company No. 1, as may become members of such corporation pursu- 26 ant to the provisions of its by-laws. Any [fireman] firefighter, howev- 27 er, who has been or shall hereafter be removed for cause, expelled or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14782-01-6 A. 10952 2 1 dropped from the rolls of any fire company or department, shall not be 2 eligible for membership in such corporation. 3 § 622.4 Control and disposal of funds and property. The control and 4 disposal of the funds, property and estate of such corporation and the 5 management of its affairs shall be vested in a board of trustees, which 6 shall consist of five members of such corporation. The officers of such 7 corporation shall be in such number and designated and shall have and 8 exercise such powers and duties as may be provided by the by-laws. The 9 trustees and officers shall be elected at the annual meeting of such 10 corporation in the manner prescribed by its by-laws. The funds of such 11 corporation, by unanimous vote of the trustees, may be used [for the 12 relief, aid and assistance of disabled or indigent active or exempt 13 volunteer firemen of the Albertson Hook, Ladder, Engine and Hose Company 14 No. 1] in furtherance of its purposes set forth in section 622.1 of this 15 article. 16 § 622.5 Precept for payment of foreign fire insurance premium taxes. 17 a. Such corporation shall collect and there shall be paid to it all tax 18 imposed by section [five hundred and fifty-three] nine thousand one 19 hundred four of the insurance law, for fire department use and benefit, 20 upon premiums on policies of insurance against loss or damage by fire 21 covering property situated within the area protected by the Albertson 22 Hook, Ladder, Engine and Hose Company No. 1, and within any duly organ- 23 ized territory in which the Albertson Hook, Ladder, Engine and Hose 24 Company No. 1 is, or may hereafter be, obligated to render fire 25 protection. 26 b. The officer of such corporation designated by its by-laws to 27 collect and receive the aforesaid tax shall the same powers as provided 28 by law for the treasurer of a fire department with respect to such 29 collection and receipt. 30 c. Such corporation shall also be entitled to receive a share of the 31 tax imposed by section [five hundred and fifty-four] nine thousand one 32 hundred five of the insurance law, based upon premiums written in the 33 territory with respect to which it is entitled to collect and receive 34 the tax under section [five hundred and fifty-three] nine thousand one 35 hundred four of the insurance law. 36 d. Such taxes shall only be used [for the care and relief of disabled 37 or indigent volunteer and exempt firemen and their families] by the 38 corporation in furtherance of its purposes set forth in section 622.1 of 39 this article. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.